Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2508.01
Place of residence, defined.

Place of residence shall mean the street and number of the residence. If there is no street and number for the residence, place of residence shall mean the mailing address.

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 3.